Nebraska statutes.
Revised Statutes Cumulative Supplement, 202677-5906
Tax credit; amount; claim; expiration; interest.

(1) Taxpayers shall be entitled to refundable tax credits for the taxpayer's new investment or new employment in the microbusiness during the tax year. The tax credits shall be equal to:

(a) Twenty percent of the taxpayer's new investment; and

(b) Twenty percent of the taxpayer's new employment.

(2) The total amount of tax credits shall not exceed the amount of tentative tax credits approved by the department under section 77-5905.

(3) The taxpayer shall claim the tax credit by filing a form developed by the Tax Commissioner and attaching the tentative tax credit certification granted by the department. Tentative tax credits expire after the end of the tax year following the year the tentative tax credit was certified.

(4) The total lifetime tax credits claimed by any one taxpayer and any related person under the Nebraska Advantage Microenterprise Tax Credit Act shall be limited to twenty thousand dollars.

(5) Interest shall not be allowed on any taxes refunded under the act.

(6) The changes made to this section by Laws 2021, LB366, shall apply to all applications for benefits received on or after August 28, 2021.

Laws 2005, LB 312, § 71;

Laws 2009, LB164, § 12;

Laws 2021, LB366, § 3.